Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1390
Historically significant real property; final certificate of rehabilitation; issuance.

Upon completion of the rehabilitation the owner shall provide the following information to the State Historic Preservation Officer to obtain a final certificate of rehabilitation:

(1) Documentation of the dates on which construction commenced and was completed;

(2) Clear, current black and white or color photographs showing the completed rehabilitation work, the appearance of the structure immediately prior to the rehabilitation, and, if possible, the historic appearance of the historically significant real property;

(3) A written description of the original condition of the historically significant real property;

(4) A written description of the present condition of the historically significant real property; and

(5) A written description and, if applicable, final plans and specifications of the rehabilitation.

The State Historic Preservation Officer shall issue a final certificate of rehabilitation to the owner if the rehabilitation meets the Standards for Rehabilitation as described in 36 C.F.R. 67.7, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2005, and transmit a copy to the county assessor within seven days after issuance of the certificate to the owner.

Laws 2005, LB 66, § 6.